Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1735
Foreign support order; continuance; undisputed amount; withholding.

If the obligor presents evidence which constitutes a full or partial defense under section 43-1734, the court shall, on the request of the obligee, continue the case to permit further evidence relative to the defense to be adduced by either party, except that if the obligor acknowledges liability sufficient to entitle the obligee to income withholding, the court shall require such withholding for the payment of current child, spousal, or medical support payments under the foreign support order and of so much of any arrearage as is not in dispute, while continuing the case with respect to those matters still in dispute. The court shall determine such matters as soon as possible and if appropriate shall modify the withholding order to conform to its determination.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 55;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 40.